Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska39-2809
Design-build contract; progressive design-build contract; construction manager-general contract; authorized.

A contracting agency, in accordance with sections 39-2808 to 39-2824, may solicit and execute a design-build contract, a progressive design-build contract, or a construction manager-general contractor contract for a public project, other than a project that is primarily resurfacing, rehabilitation, or restoration.

Laws 2016, LB960, § 9;

Laws 2019, LB583, § 4;

Laws 2022, LB1016, § 4.